Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-944
Supplemental
retirement benefit; receipt by beneficiary.

If
a beneficiary is receiving the annuity provided through the School Employees Retirement System
of the State of Nebraska or through the retirement system for Class V districts
as provided by the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, the supplemental
benefit shall be the benefit that would be computed under section 79-942 had
the deceased retired person still been alive. The beneficiary will continue
to receive the supplemental benefit until the expiration of the annuity option
selected by the member.

Laws 1980, LB 228, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 141, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1562;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 579;

Laws 1998, LB 497, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 29.

Class V School Employees Retirement Act, see section 79-978.01.